Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska37-433
Violations;
penalty; affirmative defense.

Unless otherwise
provided in sections 37-426 to 37-433, any person who violates any provision
of sections 37-426 to 37-433 or who violates or fails to comply with any rule or regulation thereunder
shall be guilty of a Class V misdemeanor and
shall be fined at least fifty dollars upon conviction.

It shall be an affirmative defense to prosecution for any
violation of sections 37-426 to 37-433 for which possession is an element
of the offense that such possession was not the result of effort or determination
or that the actor was unaware of his or her physical possession or control
for a sufficient period to have been able to terminate such possession or
control.

Laws 1976, LB 861, § 15;

Laws 1977, LB 41, § 7;

Laws 1983, LB 174, § 9;

Laws 1996, LB 584, § 17;

R.S.Supp.,1996, § 37-216.09;

Laws 1998, LB 922, § 143;

Laws 2009, LB105, § 13.